Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Escape of person in lawful custody, and as to assault on, resistance to, or other action against officer or guard within penal institution, §

16-10-52

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1987, p. 3550), the General Assembly directed the Board of Corrections to designate the correctional facility in Forsyth, Monroe County, Georgia, as the “A.L. ‘Al’ Burruss Correctional Training Center” and to affix an appropriate plaque at the entrance to that center indicating that designation.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 334), the General Assembly designated the correctional facility in Pennville, Chattooga County, Georgia, as the “Forest Hays, Jr., Correctional Institution.”

By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 1470), the General Assembly created the Commission on Criminal Sanctions and Correctional Facilities, to be abolished January 1, 1990.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1991, p. 1203), the General Assembly designated the probation detention center in Fulton County, Georgia as the “J. Carrell Larmore Probation Detention Center.”

By resolution (Ga. L. 1992, p. 3109), the General Assembly designated the correctional institution in Mitchell County as the “Jimmy Autry Correctional Institution.”

42-5-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Corrections.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of corrections.

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-1

; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

Cross references.

Notification to Department of Corrections, Uniform Superior Court Rules, Rule 35.1.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act).

42-5-2.
Responsibilities of governmental unit with custody of inmate; costs of emergency and follow-up care; access to medical services or hospital care; hospital requirements for providing emergency health care services to state inmates.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, it shall be the responsibility of the governmental unit, subdivision, or agency having the physical custody of an inmate to maintain the inmate, furnishing him food, clothing, and any needed medical and hospital attention; to defend any habeas corpus or other proceedings instituted by or on behalf of the inmate; and to bear all expenses relative to any escape and recapture, including the expenses of extradition. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, it shall be the responsibility of the department to bear the costs of any reasonable and necessary emergency medical and hospital care which is provided to any inmate after the receipt by the department of the notice provided by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-5-50 who is in the physical custody of any other political subdivision or governmental agency of this state, except a county correctional institution, if the inmate is available and eligible for the transfer of his custody to the department pursuant to Code Section 42-5-50. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the department shall also bear the costs of any reasonable and necessary follow-up medical or hospital care rendered to any such inmate as a result of the initial emergency care and treatment of the inmate. With respect to state inmates housed in county correctional institutions, the department shall bear the costs of direct medical services required for emergency medical conditions posing an immediate threat to life or limb if the inmate cannot be placed in a state institution for the receipt of this care. The responsibility for payment will commence when the costs for direct medical services exceed an amount specified by rules and regulations of the Board of Corrections. The department will pay only the balance in excess of the specified amount. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, it shall remain the responsibility of the governmental unit having the physical custody of an inmate to bear the costs of such medical and hospital care, if the custody of the inmate has been transferred from the department pursuant to any order of any court within this state. The department shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations relative to payment of such medical and hospital costs by the department.

The officer in charge will provide an inmate access to medical services or hospital care and may arrange for the inmate’s health insurance carrier to pay the health care provider for the services or care rendered as provided in Article 3 of Chapter 4 of this title.

With respect to an inmate covered under Article 3 of Chapter 4 of this title, the costs of any medical services, emergency medical and hospital care, or follow-up medical or hospital care as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section for which a local governmental unit is responsible shall mean the costs of such medical services and hospital care which have not been paid by the inmate’s health insurance carrier or the Department of Community Health.

A hospital authority or hospital which is not a party to a contract with the Georgia Department of Corrections or its agents on July 1, 2009, shall be reimbursed no more than the applicable Georgia Medicaid rate for emergency services provided to such state inmate. For purposes of this subsection, the term “state inmate” means any inmate for whom the Georgia Department of Corrections shall be responsible for the payment of medical care thereof. Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the Georgia Department of Corrections from negotiating higher fees or rates with health care providers. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Georgia Department of Corrections or its agents enter into negotiations with health care providers to contract for the provision of services as provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1361, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1986, p. 493, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2125, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2009, p. 136, § 1A/HB 464.

Cross references.

Habeas corpus generally, T. 9, C. 14.

Law reviews.

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 310 (1992).

For note, “Finding Immunity: Manders v. Lee and the Erosion of 1983 Liability,” see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 1505 (2004).

42-5-3.
Department’s responsibility for trial costs and expenses.

The whole costs of the case and expenses of the trial involving an inmate of the state penal system charged with the violation of any criminal statute shall be borne by the department, provided the offense was committed by the inmate within the confines of a state correctional institution or was the crime of escape or attempted escape. The costs and expenses of the trial shall include, but shall not be limited to, the cost of the sheriff, bailiff, clerks, jurors, and jail fees and shall be paid by the department to the governing authority of the county in which the trial was conducted, for proper disposition.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4690; Code 1868, § 4714; Code 1873, § 4812; Code 1882, § 4812; Penal Code 1895, § 1174; Penal Code 1910, § 1230; Code 1933, § 77-401; Ga. L. 1964, p. 462, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1590, § 1.

Cross references.

Payment of costs of criminal proceedings generally, T. 17, Ch. 11.

42-5-4.
Payment of trial costs and expenses.

The clerk of the superior court from the county in which the trial specified in Code Section 42-5-3 was conducted shall submit a statement of the charges, certified by the judge of the superior court or the judge of the city court, to the department, which shall pay the charges out of the appropriations provided therefor in accordance with schedules authorized by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 462, § 2.

42-5-5.
Reimbursement of court costs and transportation and detention expenses incurred in trying escapees from state correctional institutions.

The department is authorized and directed to reimburse the clerk of the court for court costs incurred in trying a defendant for the crime of escape when the escape is from a state correctional institution and to reimburse the sheriff of the county wherein the trial takes place for the expense of transporting the defendant from the place of detention to court for trial and returning the defendant from the court to the place of detention, such reimbursement to be at the rate of 10¢ per mile.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 572, § 1.

42-5-6.
Participation by county correctional institutions in state purchasing contracts.

County correctional institutions may participate in all state purchasing contracts for the purpose of providing materials and supplies to state or county inmates.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 908, § 2.

Cross references.

State purchasing generally, §

50-5-50

et seq.

42-5-7.
Sudden or unusual death of inmate.

Whenever any inmate dies suddenly or under unusual circumstances in any correctional institution, the warden or superintendent of that institution shall immediately notify the commissioner and shall also notify the coroner of the county in which the death occurs. The warden or superintendent is also directed to furnish the department with a copy of the findings of the coroner’s inquest, together with any other information available that would be of use to the commissioner in determining the cause of death.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 25.

Cross references.

Reimbursement of counties for expenses of burial of inmates, §

36-12-5

.

Requirement of autopsy and inquest upon death of inmate occurring when physician not present or as a result of violence, § 45-16-27.

42-5-8.
Notification upon escape of inmate.

In addition to any all-points bulletin issued by the department notifying all local law enforcement agencies within the state of the escape of any inmate from the custody of the department, the department shall also, within 72 hours of the discovery of the escape, notify all parties who in the judgment of the commissioner have a legitimate need to know that the inmate has escaped and who have requested in writing that the department notify the party prior to the inmate’s release from custody.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42.

42-5-9.
Notification of projected release date of inmate.

At least 15 days prior to the projected release date of any inmate scheduled to be released pursuant to the authority of the department, the department shall notify the following persons of such projected release date by the following methods:

Each district attorney and all local law enforcement agencies throughout the state by making the necessary information available on a publicly accessible website; and

The presiding judge and the victims of crimes against the person by mail or electronic transmission. Notice to the victim shall only be required when the victim has provided the department with his or her current address. The notice to the victim or victims as required by the department in this Code section shall be reasonable notice and no liability or sanctions to the department related to notification or failure to notify shall lie against the department, its officers, or employees if said attempt at notice is of a reasonable effort.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 393, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1422, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 42; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 42/HB 95.

42-5-10.
Promulgation of rules governing plans and specifications for new correctional institutions; certification of acceptability of old facilities by state fire marshal.

The board shall prescribe by rule and regulation the required plans and specifications defining the size and type of construction and materials to be employed in constructing all state and county correctional institutions. The specifications shall require that the buildings be as nearly free from fire hazards and as nearly escape-proof as is possible under all circumstances. A certificate of approval from the state fire marshal shall be conclusive as to the acceptability of all old state or county correctional institutions from a standpoint of fire hazard. No county shall establish a county correctional institution until its establishment and the plans and specifications thereof have been approved by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 17.

42-5-11.
General prohibition against receipt of remuneration in regard to assignment, transfer, or status of inmate.

It shall be unlawful for anyone other than a duly licensed attorney who is an active member in good standing of the State Bar of Georgia and who is not a member of the General Assembly to accept a fee, money, or other remuneration, other than actual expenses, for contacting, in any manner, the commissioner, any employee of the department, or any member of the board in an attempt to influence the commissioner, employee, or board member concerning a transfer of an inmate from one correctional institution to another or concerning the status and assignment of an inmate within a correctional institution.

Any person who receives any fee, money, or other remuneration other than actual expenses, in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1218, § 1.

42-5-12.
Receipt of remuneration by state officials in regard to assignment, transfer, or status of inmate.

It shall be unlawful for members of the General Assembly or any other state elected or appointed official to accept a fee, money, or other remuneration for contacting, in any manner, the commissioner, any employee of the department, or any member of the board in an attempt to influence the commissioner, employee, or board member concerning a transfer of an inmate from one correctional institution to another or concerning the status and assignment of an inmate within a correctional institution.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to prohibit:

Members of the General Assembly or other state elected or appointed officials from appearing before or contacting the commissioner, employees of the department, or members of the board when their official duties require them to do so;

Members of the General Assembly or other state elected or appointed officials from requesting information from and presenting information to the commissioner, employees of the department, or members of the board on behalf of constituents when no compensation, gift, favor, or anything of value is accepted, either directly or indirectly, for such services; or

Members of the General Assembly or other state elected or appointed officials from contacting the commissioner, any employee of the department, or any member of the board on behalf of any person so long as there is no fee, money, or other remuneration being paid or received for such contacting.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to apply to the acceptance of compensation, expenses, and allowances received by members of the General Assembly or any other state elected or appointed official for his duties as a member or official.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall preclude any attorney from contacting a client who may be in a correctional institution or from making any reasonable contact with employees of the department to the extent that the contact with employees may be necessary to contact his client.

Any person violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1218, § 3.

42-5-13.
Record of person contacting commissioner, department, or board on behalf of inmate.

The department shall maintain a complete written record of every person contacting the commissioner, any employee of the department, or any member of the board concerning a transfer of an inmate from one correctional institution to another or concerning the status and assignment of an inmate within a correctional institution. The record shall include the name and address of the person contacting the commissioner, employee, or board member and the reason for the contact.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1218, § 2.

42-5-14.
Establishment of guard lines and signs at state or county correctional institutions.

Guard lines shall be established by the warden, superintendent, or his designated representative in charge at the various state or county correctional institutions in the same manner that land lines are established, except that, at each corner of the lines, signs must be used on which shall be plainly stamped or written: “Guard line of
_______________ .” Signs shall also be placed at all entrances and exits for vehicles and pedestrians at the institutions and at such intervals along the guard lines as will reasonably place all persons approaching the guard lines on notice of the location of the institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1903, p. 71, § 3; Penal Code 1910, § 1231; Code 1933, § 77-403; Ga. L. 1961, p. 45, § 1.

42-5-15.
Crossing of guard lines with weapons, intoxicants, or drugs without consent of warden or superintendent.

It shall be unlawful for any person to come inside the guard lines established at any state or county correctional institution with a gun, pistol, or any other weapon or with or under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, amphetamines, biphetamines, or any other hallucinogenic or other drugs, without the knowledge or consent of the warden, superintendent, or his or her designated representative.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than four years.

History.

Ga. L. 1903, p. 71, § 1; Penal Code 1910, § 1232; Code 1933, § 77-404; Ga. L. 1961, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 220, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 3-2/SB 149.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “or her” near the end of subsection (a).

42-5-16.
Trading with inmates without consent of warden or superintendent.

It shall be unlawful for any person to trade or traffic with, buy from, or sell any article to an inmate without the knowledge and consent of the warden, superintendent, or the designated representative in charge.

History.

Ga. L. 1903, p. 71, § 2; Penal Code 1910, § 1233; Code 1933, § 77-405; Ga. L. 1961, p. 45, § 1.

42-5-17.
Loitering near inmates after being ordered to desist.

It shall be unlawful for any person to loaf, linger, or stand around where inmates are employed or kept after having been ordered by the warden, superintendent, or designated representative in charge of the inmates to desist therefrom.

History.

Ga. L. 1903, p. 71, § 5; Penal Code 1910, § 1234; Code 1933, § 77-406; Ga. L. 1961, p. 45, § 1.

Cross references.

Prohibition against solicitation of business by professional bondsmen at places where prisoners are confined, §

17-6-52

.

42-5-18.
Items prohibited for possession by inmates; warden’s authorization; penalty; use of unmanned aircraft to accomplish violations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Inmate” means a prisoner, detainee, criminal suspect, immigration detainee, or other person held, incarcerated, or detained in a place of incarceration, whether or not such person is inside or outside of such place of incarceration.

“Place of incarceration” means any prison, probation detention center, jail, or institution, including any state, federal, local, or privately operated facility, used for the purpose of incarcerating criminals or detainees.

“Telecommunications device” means a device, an apparatus associated with a device, or a component of a device that enables, or may be used to enable, communication with a person outside a place of incarceration, including a telephone, cellular telephone, personal digital assistant, transmitting radio, or computer connected or capable of being connected to a computer network, by wireless or other technology, or otherwise capable of communicating with a person or device outside of a place of incarceration.

“Warden or superintendent” means the commissioner or any warden, superintendent, sheriff, chief jailor, or other person who is responsible for the overall management and operation of a place of incarceration.

It shall be unlawful for any person to obtain for, to procure for, or to give to an inmate a gun, pistol, or any other weapon; any intoxicating liquor; amphetamines, biphetamines, or any other hallucinogenic drugs or other drugs, regardless of the amount; any telecommunications device; or any other article or item without the authorization of the warden or superintendent or his or her designee.

(b.1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to obtain for, to procure for, or to give to an inmate tobacco or any product containing tobacco without the authorization of the warden or superintendent or his or her designee.

It shall be unlawful for an inmate to possess a gun, pistol, or any other weapon; any intoxicating liquor; tobacco or any product containing tobacco; amphetamines, biphetamines, or any other hallucinogenic drugs or other drugs, regardless of the amount; a telecommunications device; or any other item without the authorization of the warden or superintendent or his or her designee.

An inmate who commits or attempts to commit a violation of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years; provided, however, that if an inmate violates this Code section while being held pursuant to an arrest or conviction for a misdemeanor offense, the possession of a telecommunications device in violation of this Code section shall be treated as a misdemeanor.

A person who commits or attempts to commit a violation of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of two years but not more than ten years, and no portion of the mandatory minimum sentence imposed shall be suspended, stayed, probated, deferred, or withheld by the sentencing court.

A person who commits or attempts to commit a violation of subsection (b.1) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years.

It shall be unlawful for an inmate to possess a stored value card, the account number of a stored value card, or the personal identification number of a stored value card.

It shall be unlawful for any person to obtain for, to procure for, or to give an inmate a stored value card, the account number of a stored value card, or the personal identification number of a stored value card.

A person who commits a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than one nor more than ten years, unless the judge imposes a misdemeanor sentence pursuant to Code Section 17-10-5.

It shall be unlawful for any person to intentionally use an unmanned aircraft system to violate the provisions of subsection (b) or (b.1) of this Code section.

It shall be unlawful for any person to intentionally photograph or otherwise record images of a place of incarceration through the use of an unmanned aircraft system for purposes of committing a criminal offense.

Any person may secure prior authorization from the warden or the superintendent, or his or her designated representative, of such place of incarceration for photographing or recording as evidence of a noncriminal intent; provided, however, that failure to secure such prior authorization shall not evidence a criminal intent.

Any person who commits or attempts to commit a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced as follows:

Any person convicted of a violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than ten years; and

Any person convicted of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “unmanned aircraft system” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 6-1-4.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 1506, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 593, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 533, § 1/SB 366; Ga. L. 2016, p. 811, § 8/HB 874; Ga. L. 2017, p. 673, § 3-3/SB 149; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 42/SB 365; Ga. L. 2019, p. 293, § 1/SB 6; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 42/SB 429.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, designated the existing provisions of subsection (d) as paragraph (d)(1); in paragraph (d)(1), substituted “An inmate” for “A person” in the beginning, inserted “subsection (c) of”, and substituted “an inmate” for “a person” in the middle; and added paragraph (d)(2).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “, whether or not such person is inside or outside of such place of incarceration” at the end of paragraph (a)(1); added paragraph (b.1); inserted “tobacco or any product containing tobacco;” near the beginning of subsection (c); added paragraph (d)(3); and added subsection (e).

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “means the commissioner” for “shall mean the commissioner” in paragraph (a)(4); and substituted “provided, however, that if an inmate” for “provided, however, if an inmate” in the proviso of paragraph (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (f).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised capitalization in paragraph (f)(4).

Cross references.

Similar provisions regarding furnishing of alcoholic beverages to inmates of jails, penal institutions, correctional facilities, or other lawful places of confinement, §

3-3-25

.

42-5-19.
Penalty for violating Code Section 42-5-16 or 42-5-17.

Any person who violates Code Section 42-5-16 or 42-5-17 shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one nor more than five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1506, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 533, § 2/SB 366.

42-5-20.
Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program.

The department shall provide within the correctional system an Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program. The program shall be made available to every person sentenced to the custody of the state whose criminal offense or history indicates alcohol or drug involvement; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to a person who has been sentenced to the punishment of death or those deemed mentally incompetent.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 625, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 enactment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 301 (1995).

42-5-21.
Family Violence Counseling Program.

The department shall provide within the correctional system a Family Violence Counseling Program. The program shall be made available to every person sentenced to the custody of the state who committed an offense which has been identified to involve family violence as such term is defined in Code Section 19-13-1; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to a person who has been sentenced to the punishment of death or to those deemed mentally incompetent.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1113, § 1.